Florida, session 2026, SB1414.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âSection 383.142, Florida Statutes, is created to 37 read: 38 383.142âEducation on congenital cytomegalovirus.âThe 39 Department of Health, in consultation with medical experts 40 identified by the department, shall develop educational 41 materials on congenital cytomegalovirus to be distributed to 42 expectant and new parents or caregivers as part of any 43 maternity, prenatal, or newborn services or education provided 44 by hospitals, birth centers, or obstetrics and gynecology 45 physician practices in this state. 46 (1)âThe educational materials must include, but need not be 47 limited to, an explanation of all of the following: 48 (a)âThe causes, symptoms, and effects of cytomegalovirus 49 infection and the ways it can be prevented. The materials must 50 emphasize the fact that the virus can spread from person to 51 person without detection and can be particularly dangerous if 52 transmitted from a pregnant woman to her child as congenital 53 cytomegalovirus. 54 (b)âThe manner in which congenital cytomegalovirus, if 55 contracted, can lead to neurological issues, such as seizures, 56 cerebral palsy, and developmental delays; sensory loss, such as 57 hearing and vision loss; physical problems, such as low birth 58 weight, jaundice, and enlarged liver and spleen; and, in severe 59 cases, pregnancy loss. The materials must emphasize the 60 importance of early testing for congenital cytomegalovirus in 61 newborns and infants to preserve their health and prevent 62 lifelong health complications. 63 (c)âThe screening requirements of s. 383.145. 64 (2)âEach hospital, birth center, and obstetrics and 65 gynecology physician practice in this state providing maternity, 66 prenatal, or newborn services or education shall provide the 67 educational materials developed by the department under this 68 section to expectant or new parents or caregivers receiving such 69 services or education. The department shall provide the 70 educational materials to child care facilities and any other 71 entity deemed relevant by the department. 72 Section 2.âSection 456.0302, Florida Statutes, is created 73 to read: 74 456.0302âRequirement for instruction on congenital 75 cytomegalovirus.â 76 (1)âBeginning July 1, 2026, the applicable board shall 77 require each person licensed under chapter 458, chapter 459, 78 part I of chapter 464, or chapter 467 to complete a 1-hour 79 continuing education course, approved by the board, on 80 congenital cytomegalovirus as part of initial licensure and 81 every other biennial licensure renewal. The approved course must 82 include instruction on all of the following: 83 (a)âThe causes, symptoms, and effects of cytomegalovirus 84 infection and the ways it can be prevented. 85 (b)âThe manner in which congenital cytomegalovirus, if 86 contracted, can lead to neurological issues, sensory loss, 87 physical problems, and, in severe cases, pregnancy loss. 88 (c)âThe screening requirements of s. 383.145 and the 89 importance of early testing for congenital cytomegalovirus in 90 newborns and infants to preserve their health and prevent 91 lifelong health complications. 92 (2)âEach such licensee must submit confirmation of having 93 completed such course, on a form provided by the board, when 94 submitting fees for every other biennial licensure renewal. 95 (3)âEach board that requires a licensee to complete 96 continuing education under this section shall include the hour 97 required for completion of the course in the total hours of 98 continuing education required by law for such profession unless 99 the continuing education requirements for such profession 100 consist of fewer than 30 hours biennially. 101 (4)âA person holding two or more licenses subject to this 102 section may show proof of having completed one board-approved 103 course on congenital cytomegalovirus for purposes of relicensure 104 for additional licenses. 105 (5)âFailure to comply with the requirements of this section 106 constitutes grounds for disciplinary action under each 107 respective practice act and under s. 456.072(1)(k). In addition 108 to discipline by the board, the licensee must be required to 109 complete such course. 110 (6)âEach board may adopt rules to implement this section. 111 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.